test/src/gt-desc-yamls/V-tegemae81_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tegemä: # Verb (81) tegemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tegemä+V+Inf/mA: tegemä
     tegemä+V+Inf: tetäq
     tegemä+V+Act+PrfPrc: tennüq
     tegemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [tett, tettü]

     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tii
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [tiit, tiideq]
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tege
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [teemiq, tiimiq]
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tiitiq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tegeväq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: tiiq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: tii
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tei, teie, tekse]
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [teit, teiq, teiet, teieq, teideq, teiedeq, tekset, tekseq, teksedeq]
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tekḱ, tegi, tekse]
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [teimiq, teiemiq, teksemiq]
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [teitiq, teietiq, teksetiq]
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [teiq, teiväq, teieq, teieväq, tekseq, tekseväq]

     tegemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tetä
     tegemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tetäs

     tegemä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tettäv

     tegemä+V+Jus: [tekuq, tekkuq]
